src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
!! Numerals
!  --------
!! Numerals in the Somali language are numbers.

LEXICON Numerals
  NumeralCirc ;
  Numeral ;

LEXICON NumeralCirc
+Use/CircN: NumeralPre ;

LEXICON NumeralPre
+Use/Circ: ARABIC ; ! for the arabic numerals !
+Use/Circ: ROMAN ; ! for the roman numerals!
+Use/Circ: NUM-PREFIXES ; ! for §34 etc.!
! TODO: +Use/Circ: ISOLATED-NUMEXP ; ! for ½ etc.!

LEXICON Numeral
  ordinal ; 
  cardinal ; 
  Numeral_digit ; 

LEXICON cardinal
  kow		NUM1 ;
  laba		NUM1_FEMd ;
  saddex		NUM1_FEM ;
  afar		NUM1_FEM ;
  shan		NUM1_FEM ;
  lix		NUM1_FEM ;
  toddoba		NUM1_FEMd ;
  siddeed		NUM1_FEM ;
  sagaal		NUM1_MASC ;
  toban:tob%^an		NUM1_MASC ;
  labaatan		NUM1 ;
  soddon		NUM1 ;
  afartan		NUM1 ;
  konton		NUM1 ;
  lixdan		NUM1 ;
  toddobaatan		NUM1 ;
  siddeetan		NUM1 ;
  sagaashan		NUM1 ;
  boqol		NUM1 ;
  kun		NUM1 ;

LEXICON ordinal
  kowaad		ORD2 ;
  labaad		ORD2 ;
  saddexaad		ORD2 ;
  afaraad		ORD2 ;
  afraad		ORD2 ;
  shanaad		ORD2 ;
  lixaad		ORD2 ;
  toddobaad		ORD2 ;
  siddeedaad		ORD2 ;
  sagaalaad		ORD2 ;
  tobnaad		ORD2 ;
  tobanaad		ORD2 ;
  labaatanaad		ORD2 ;
  soddonaad		ORD2 ;
  afartanaad		ORD2 ;
  kontonaad		ORD2 ;
  lixdanaad		ORD2 ;
  toddobaatanaad		ORD2 ;
  siddeetanaad		ORD2 ;
  sagaashanaad		ORD2 ;
  boqolaad		ORD2 ;
  kunaad		ORD2 ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
